Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.630

Confidentiality of records.

(1) The existence of a proceeding for or the existence of a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or conservatorship is a matter of public record unless the court seals the record after:

(a) The respondent, the individual subject to the protective arrangement, or the parent of a minor subject to the protective arrangement requests the record be sealed; and

(b) Either:

(i) The proceeding is dismissed;

(ii) The protective arrangement is no longer in effect; or

(iii) An act authorized by the order granting the protective arrangement has been completed.

(2) A respondent, an individual subject to a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or conservatorship, an attorney designated by the respondent or individual, a parent of a minor subject to a protective arrangement, and any other person the court determines are entitled to access court records of the proceeding and resulting protective arrangement. A person not otherwise entitled access to court records under this subsection for good cause may petition the court for access. The court shall grant access if access is in the best interest of the respondent or individual subject to the protective arrangement or furthers the public interest and does not endanger the welfare or financial interests of the respondent or individual.

(3) A report of a visitor or professional evaluation generated in the course of a proceeding under this article must be sealed on filing but is available to:

(a) The court;

(b) The individual who is the subject of the report or evaluation, without limitation as to use;

(c) The petitioner, visitor, and petitioner's and respondent's attorneys, for purposes of the proceeding;

(d) Unless the court orders otherwise, an agent appointed under a power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is the principal;

(e) If the order is for a protective arrangement instead of guardianship and unless the court orders otherwise, an agent appointed under a power of attorney for health care in which the respondent is identified as the principal; and

(f) Any other person if it is in the public interest or for a purpose the court orders for good cause.

[ 2019 c 437 s 511.]